Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.071

Scope of review—Recommendations to the legislature. (Expires June 30, 2025.)

(1) In conducting the review of an entity, the joint legislative audit and review committee shall determine the scope and objectives of the review and consider, but not be limited to, the following factors, if applicable:

(a) The extent to which the entity has complied with legislative intent;

(b) The extent to which the entity is operating in an efficient and economical manner which results in optimum performance;

(c) The extent to which the entity is operating in the public interest by controlling costs;

(d) The extent to which the entity duplicates the activities of other entities or of the private sector;

(e) The extent to which the entity is meeting the performance measures developed under RCW 43.131.061; and

(f) The possible impact of the termination or modification of the entity.

(2) After completing the review under subsection (1) of this section, the committee shall make its recommendations to the legislature.

[ 2000 c 189 s 6.]